District of Columbia statutes.
6-1109.04

Annual notice to property owners.

Beginning with real property assessments for tax year 2013 and for each real property tax year thereafter, the Mayor shall provide, along with the annual notice of the assessment for the next real property tax year, each owner of real property with a historic landmark designation and each owner of real property located within a historic district information on the current law and regulations relating to historic property improvements, including regarding:

(1)

Building permits;

(2)

Consultation with Advisory Neighborhood Commissions;

(3)

Review by the Commission of Fine Arts; and

(4)

Any other information that the Mayor determines would be helpful to owners of historic properties.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-144, § 10d
as added Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-123, § 2, 59 DCR 1707
This section is referenced in § 47-824.